Missouri, session 2026, HB1945.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 338.333, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 208.149, 338.333, and 376.1245, to read as follows:
208.149. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Clinical pathology services", professional medical services provided by a
licensed physician that involve the use of medical judgment, that contribute directly to
the diagnosis, care, and treatment of individual patients, and that are necessary for
every laboratory test run in a high-complexity laboratory environment;
(2) "Hospital-based pathologist", a licensed physician specializing in pathology
who provides clinical pathology services for the laboratory within a hospital;
(3) "MO HealthNet", the Medicaid program administered by the state of
Missouri in accordance with federal and state law;
(4) "Professional component of clinical pathology services", the portion of each
clinical pathology service in a high-complexity laboratory environment that involves the
physician's use of medical judgment in interpreting and supervising laboratory tests
and that excludes the technical component of the laboratory test.
2. The professional component of clinical pathology services provided by a
hospital-based pathologist shall be recognized as distinct physician services by the MO
HealthNet program.
3. The MO HealthNet program shall reimburse the professional component of
clinical pathology services provided to MO HealthNet participants.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1945 & 2570 2
4. The reimbursement amount for the professional component of clinical
pathology services shall be set at no less than thirty percent of the approved MO
HealthNet Independent Lab - Technical Component fee schedule.
5. Payment for the professional component of clinical pathology services shall be
made directly to the licensed physician providing the services or to the entity the
licensed physician has assigned the right to receive payment for the services provided.
6. If a state plan amendment is determined by the department of social services
to be required, the department of social services shall timely submit such amendment.
If such amendment is not approved, the department shall make all reasonable efforts to
obtain federal approval, including resubmission, modification, or pursuit of any
alternative lawful mechanism necessary to implement reimbursement consistent with
this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve the department of
its obligation to implement reimbursement to the fullest extent permitted under state
and federal authority.
7. The department of social services shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
338.333. 1. Except as otherwise provided by the board of pharmacy by rule in the
event of an emergency or to alleviate a supply shortage, no person or distribution outlet shall
act as a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party
logistics provider without first obtaining license to do so from the Missouri board of
pharmacy and paying the required fee. The board may grant temporary licenses when the
wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics
provider first applies for a license to operate within the state. Temporary licenses shall
remain valid until such time as the board shall find that the applicant meets or fails to meet the
requirements for regular licensure. No license shall be issued or renewed for a wholesale
drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider to
operate unless the same shall be operated in a manner prescribed by law and according to the
rules and regulations promulgated by the board of pharmacy with respect thereto. Separate
licenses shall be required for each distribution site owned or operated by a wholesale drug
distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider, unless

HCS HBs 1945 & 2570 3
such drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider
meets the requirements of section 338.335.
2. An agent or employee of any licensed or registered wholesale drug distributor,
pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider need not seek
licensure under this section and may lawfully possess pharmaceutical drugs, if the agent or
employee is acting in the usual course of his or her business or employment.
3. The board may permit out-of-state wholesale drug distributors, drug outsourcers,
third-party logistics [provider] providers, or out-of-state pharmacy distributors to be licensed
as required by sections 338.210 to 338.370 on the basis of reciprocity to the extent that the
entity both:
(1) Possesses a valid license granted by another state pursuant to legal standards
comparable to those which must be met by a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor,
drug [outsourcers] outsourcer, or third-party logistics provider of this state as prerequisites
for obtaining a license under the laws of this state. If a state license is not issued by their
resident state, out-of-state wholesale drug distributors and third-party logistics
providers with a current and valid drug distributor accreditation from the National
Association of Boards of Pharmacy or its successor may be eligible for licensure as
provided by the board by rule; and
(2) Distributes into Missouri from a state which would extend reciprocal treatment
under its own laws to a wholesale drug distributor, pharmacy distributor, drug outsourcers, or
third-party logistics provider of this state.
376.1245. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Anesthesia time", the period during which an anesthesia practitioner is
present with the patient, starting when the anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare the
patient for anesthesia services in the operating room or an equivalent area and ending
when the anesthesia practitioner is no longer furnishing anesthesia services to the
patient because the patient may be placed safely under postoperative or postanesthesia
care. The term "anesthesia time" includes, if counted by the anesthesia practitioner,
blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time, provided the anesthesia
practitioner is furnishing continuous anesthesia care within the time periods around the
interruption;
(2) "Anesthesia time units", time units recognized with appropriate time
intervals that do not exceed fifteen minutes in length for each interval and that, taken
together, represent the total anesthesia time for a particular anesthesia service;
(3) "Excepted benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.998;

HCS HBs 1945 & 2570 4
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350. The term "health benefit plan" shall also include MO HealthNet, the
children's health insurance program authorized under chapter 208, the Missouri
consolidated health care plan established under chapter 103, and any other state-
sponsored health insurance program;
(5) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350.
The term "health carrier" shall also include the MO HealthNet division and any
Medicaid managed care organization as defined in section 208.431;
(6) "Payment of anesthesia services", an amount paid for anesthesia services:
(a) Determined by using prevailing medical coding and billing standards in the
professional medical billing community, such as the Current Procedural Terminology
code book published by the American Medical Association, the Medicare Claims
Processing Manual, or guidance from nationally recognized anesthesia organizations;
and
(b) Calculated as the product obtained by multiplying the following together:
a. The sum of the base units for the appropriate medical code plus anesthesia
time units and modifying units; and
b. An anesthesia conversion factor that is defined in the individual contract
between the health carrier or health benefit plan and the anesthesia practitioner or
group.
2. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall establish, implement, or enforce
any policy, practice, or procedure that imposes a time limit for the payment of
anesthesia services provided during a medical or surgical procedure.
3. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall establish, implement, or enforce
any policy, practice, or procedure that restricts or excludes all anesthesia time in
calculating the payment of anesthesia services.
4. Excepted benefit plans shall be subject to the requirements of this section.
✔